Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 7
ACCESSIBILITY FOR ELECTORS WITH DISABILITIES

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this part 7, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-701. Legislative declaration - federal funds.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is the intent of the general assembly that all state requirements should meet or exceed the minimum federal requirements for accessibility of voting systems and polling locations to persons with disabilities.

All state laws, rules, standards, and codes governing voting systems and polling location accessibility shall be maintained to ensure that the state is eligible for federal funds.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1354, § 15, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 713, § 50, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-702. Definitions.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Accessible voter interface device" means a device that communicates voting instructions and the information on the ballot to an elector and allows the elector to select and vote for candidates, ballot questions, and ballot issues in accordance with the standards in section 1-5-704. A ballot marking device may be considered an accessible voter interface device.

"Alternative formats" has the same meaning ascribed in the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", as amended, (Pub.L. 101-336), codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., including specifically the technical assistance manuals promulgated thereunder.

(2.5) "Ballot marking device" means a device that allows an elector to mark a ballot card used in an electromechanical voting system and that meets the standards in section 1-5-704 (1)(o).

"Tactile input device" means a device such as a keyboard with which an elector provides information to a voting system by touching the device.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1354, § 15, effective May 28.

L. 2007:

(1) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1975, § 18, effective August 3.

1-5-703. Accessibility of polling locations to persons with disabilities.

Each polling location shall comply fully with the current "ADA standards for accessible design" set forth in 28 CFR 36 and promulgated in accordance with the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", as amended, 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., and no barrier shall impede the path of electors with disabilities to the voting booth.

Emergency polling locations are exempt from compliance with this section.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a designated election official shall only select as polling locations such sites that meet the standards of accessibility set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Before selecting polling locations, the designated election official shall submit to the secretary of state an accessibility survey in the form prescribed by the secretary of state identifying the criteria for selecting accessible polling locations and applying the criteria to proposed polling locations.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1354, § 15, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 714, § 51, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-704. Standards for accessible voting systems.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, each voting system certified by the secretary of state for use in local, state, and federal elections shall have the capability to accept accessible voter interface devices in the voting system configuration to allow the voting system to meet the following minimum standards:

The voting system shall provide a tactile input or audio input device, or both.

The voting system shall provide a method by which electors can confirm any tactile or audio input by audio output using synthetic or recorded human speech.

Any operable controls on the input device that are needed by electors who are visually impaired shall be indicated in braille or otherwise discernible tactilely without actuating the keys.

Devices providing audio and visual access shall be able to work both separately and simultaneously.

If a nonaudio access approach is provided, the voting system may not require color perception. The voting system shall use black text or graphics, or both, on white background or white text or graphics, or both, on black background, unless the secretary of state approves other high-contrast color combinations that do not require color perception.

Any voting system that requires any visual perception shall allow the font size as it appears to the voter to be set from a minimum of fourteen points to a maximum of twenty-four points before the voting system is delivered to the polling location.

The voting system shall provide audio information, including any audio output using synthetic or recorded human speech or any auditory feedback tones that are important for the use of the audio approach, through at least one mode, by handset or headset, at high volume and shall provide incremental volume control with output amplification up to a level of at least ninety-seven decibel sound pressure level.

For voice signals transmitted to the elector, the voting system shall provide a gain adjustable up to a minimum of twenty decibels with at least one intermediate step of twelve decibels.

If the voting system can exceed one hundred twenty decibel sound pressure level, a mechanism shall be included to reset the volume automatically to the voting system's default volume level after every use, such as when the handset is replaced, but not before. Universal precautions in the use and sharing of headsets should be followed.

If sound cues and audible information such as "beeps" are used, simultaneous corresponding visual cues and information shall be provided.

Controls and mechanisms shall be operable with one hand, including with a closed fist, and operable without tight grasping, pinching, or twisting of the wrist.

The force required to operate or activate the controls may not exceed five pounds of force.

Voting booths shall have voting controls at a minimum height of thirty-six inches above the finished floor with a minimum knee clearance of twenty-seven inches high, thirty inches wide, and nineteen inches deep, or the accessible voter interface devices shall be designed so as to allow their use on top of a table to meet such requirements. Tabletop installations shall ensure adequate privacy.

Audio ballots shall meet the following standards:

After the initial instruction from an election official, the elector shall be able to independently operate the voter interface device through the final step of casting a ballot without assistance.

The elector shall be able to determine the offices for which the elector is allowed to vote and to determine the candidates for each office.

The elector shall be able to determine how many candidates may be selected for each office.

The elector shall have the ability to verify that the physical or vocal inputs given to the voting system have selected the candidates that the elector intended to select.

The elector shall be able to review the candidate selections that the elector has made.

Before casting the ballot, the elector shall have the opportunity to change any selections previously made and confirm a new selection.

The voting system shall communicate to the elector the fact that the elector has failed to vote for an office or has failed to vote the number of allowable candidates for an office and require the elector to confirm his or her intent to undervote before casting the ballot.

The voting system shall warn the elector of the consequences of overvoting for an office.

The elector shall have the opportunity to input a candidate's name for each office that allows a write-in candidate.

The elector shall have the opportunity to review the elector's write-in input to the voter interface device, edit that input, and confirm that the edits meet the elector's intent.

The voting system shall require a clear, identifiable action from the elector to cast the ballot. The voting system shall explain to the elector how to take this action so that the elector has minimal risk of taking the action accidentally, but when the elector intends to cast the ballot, the action can be easily performed.

After the ballot is cast, the voting system shall confirm to the elector that the ballot has been cast and the elector's process of voting is complete.

After the ballot is cast, the voting system shall prevent the elector from modifying the ballot cast or voting another ballot.

Ballot marking devices shall meet the following standards:

The elector shall be able simultaneously to view ballot choices on a high-resolution visual display and to listen to ballot choices with headphones.

The elector shall be able to listen to ballot choices in complete privacy and to turn off the visual display.

The ballot marking device shall have multiple output connections to accommodate various headsets so that the elector is able to use the headset provided with the ballot marking device or his or her own headset.

The elector shall be able to mark the ballot card in complete independence and in accordance with federal and state law on mandatory accessibility for persons with disabilities.

The ballot marking device shall allow a blind or visually impaired elector to vote in complete privacy.

The ballot marking device shall have a completely integrated input keypad containing commonly accepted voter accessibility keys with Braille markings.

The elector shall be able to enter ballot choices using an assistive device, including but not limited to a sip and puff device and a jelly switch.

The elector shall be able to magnify the ballot choices on the visual display and to adjust the volume and speed of the audio output.

The ballot marking device shall have multiple language capability.

The elector shall have the opportunity to input a candidate's name for each office that allows a write-in candidate and to review the elector's write-in input, edit that input, and confirm that the edits meet the elector's intent.

The elector shall be able independently to review all ballot choices and make corrections before the ballot card is marked, including by receiving a replacement ballot if the elector is otherwise unable to change the ballot or correct an error.

The elector shall be able to verify, visually or using the audio interface, that the ballot card inserted into the device at the start of voting is blank and that the marked ballot card produced by the ballot marking device is marked as the elector intended.

The ballot marking device shall alert the elector before the ballot is marked that the elector has made an overvote, as defined in section 1-1-104 (23.4), or an undervote, as defined in section 1-1-104 (49.7), and allow the elector to make corrections.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1355, § 15, effective May 28.

L. 2007:

(1)(o) added, p. 1975, § 19, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

(1)(f) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 714, § 52, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (1)(f) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-705. Accessible voter interface devices - minimum requirement.

A voting system must include at least one direct recording electronic voting system specially equipped for individuals with disabilities or other accessible voter interface device installed at each polling location that meets the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1357, § 15, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(2) repealed, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 833, § 14, effective May 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 715, § 53, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-706. Ballot access for voters with a disability - definition.

The secretary of state shall establish procedures to enable a voter with a disability to independently and privately mark a ballot or use an electronic voting device that produces a paper record using nonvisual access, low-vision access, or other assistive technology in order for the voter to vote in a mail ballot election pursuant to article 7.5 of this title 1. The procedures shall include a method, to be determined by the secretary of state, by which a voter with a disability may request such a ballot.

(1.5) In addition to the procedures specified in subsection (1) of this section, the secretary of state shall establish an electronic transmission system through which a voter with a disability may request and return a ballot.

A voter with a disability who requests that a ballot and balloting materials be sent to the voter by electronic transmission may choose electronic mail delivery or, if offered by the voter's jurisdiction, other electronic means. The designated election official in each jurisdiction charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials shall transmit the ballot and balloting materials to the voter using the means of transmission chosen by the voter.

If a ballot application from a voter with a disability arrives after the jurisdiction begins transmitting ballots and balloting materials to voters, the official charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials shall transmit them to the voter within seventy-two hours after the receipt of the application.

A voter with a disability who receives a ballot pursuant to this subsection (2) may print and return the ballot or may return the ballot by electronic transmission if the voter affirms the voter is an eligible person in accordance with subsection (2)(d) of this section. To be valid, a ballot returned by a voter pursuant to this subsection (2) must include a signed affidavit or a copy of an acceptable form of identification as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5) and must be received by the election official in the applicable jurisdiction before the close of polls on the day of the election.

As used in this section, "eligible person" means an individual who, regardless of any other disability:

Is blind;

Has a visual impairment or perceptual or reading disability that cannot be improved to give visual function substantially equivalent to that of a person who has no such impairment or disability and so is unable to read or mark a ballot to substantially the same degree as a person without an impairment or disability; or

Is otherwise unable, through physical disability, to hold, mark, or manipulate a ballot or to focus or move the eyes to the extent that would be normally acceptable for reading or marking a ballot.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-202), ch. 327, p. 3038, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1.5) and (2)(d) added and (2)(c) amended, (SB 21-188), ch. 171, p. 945, § 1, effective September 7.